Washington statutes.
RCW 36.70.230

Board of adjustment—Terms.

If the board of adjustment is to consist of three members, when it is first appointed after June 10, 1959, the first terms shall be as follows: One shall be appointed for one year; one, for two years; and one, for three years. If it consists of five members, when it is first appointed after June 10, 1959, the first terms shall be as follows: One shall be appointed for one year; one, for two years; one, for three years; one, for four years; and one, for six years. Thereafter the terms shall be for six years and until their successors are appointed and qualified.

[ 1963 c 4 s 36.70.230. Prior: 1959 c 201 s 23.]